Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB194.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 45 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 311. Methods for advertising.(a) Advertisement or notice requirements.--Notwithstanding the provisions of this title or any law or regulation to the contrary, when an advertisement or notice is required by law, rule or regulation, a local government unit shall satisfy the requirement by using one of the following methods:(1) a newspaper as defined in section 101 (relating to definitions), printed or circulated generally in the county <--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122 in which the local government unit is located;(2) the local government unit's publicly accessible Internet website; or(3) the publicly accessible Internet website of a newspaper listed in paragraph (1) or any other publicly accessible Internet website that has the primary purpose of posting advertisements or notices.(b) Legal journal requirement.--Use by a local government unit of a method specified in subsection (a) to satisfy the requirement to publish an advertisement or notice required by law, rule or regulation does not relieve the local government unit of the duty to publish in a legal journal if otherwise required to by section 308 (relating to additional publication in legal journals) or other provision of law.(c) Requirements for advertisements.--Use by a local government unit of a method specified in subsection (a)(2) or (3) to satisfy the requirement to publish an advertisement or notice required by law, rule or regulation shall also require a local government unit to do the following:(1) Post a copy of each advertisement or notice prominently at the principal office of the local government unit or at the public building in which the local government unit meets. If an advertisement or notice is unable to be posted at the principal office of the local government unit or at the public building in which the local government unit meets, the county in which the local government unit is located shall provide space for the postings where the local government unit is responsible for posting its advertisements or notices.(2) Adopt a resolution declaring the local government 20250SB0194PN0933 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unit's intent to use one or more of the methods in subsection (a)(2) or (3) to satisfy the requirement to publish an advertisement or notice required by law, rule or regulation prior to utilizing one of those methods. If the methods of advertising are revised or updated, the local government unit shall declare its intent by a new resolution and specifically identify the new methods of advertising. Following adoption of a resolution under this paragraph and prior to publishing an advertisement or notice using the methods specified in subsection (a)(2) or (3), the local government unit shall publish notice in all methods of advertising utilized immediately prior to adopting the resolution , announcing that advertisements and notices shall be made public using the alternative methods selected by the local government unit.(3) Retain a copy of the advertisement or notice for no less than three years.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "PUBLICATION" IN SECTION 101(A) OF TITLE 45 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED AND THE SUBSECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING DEFINITIONS TO READ:§ 101. DEFINITIONS.(A) DEFINITIONS APPLICABLE TO PRINTING OR NEWSPAPER ADVERTISING LAWS.--SUBJECT TO ADDITIONAL DEFINITIONS CONTAINED IN SUBSEQUENT PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE WHICH ARE APPLICABLE TO SPECIFIC PROVISIONS OF THIS TITLE, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN:(1) THIS TITLE; OR(2) ANY OTHER LAW RELATING TO PRINTING OR NEWSPAPER ADVERTISING;SHALL HAVE, UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE, THE 20250SB0194PN0933 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION:* * *"ALTERNATIVE PUBLICATION METHOD." A METHOD OF ADVERTISING OR PUBLIC NOTICE THAT INCLUDES PUBLICATION ON A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF A COUNTY AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT OR A LINK ON A PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF A COUNTY AND A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT THAT CONNECTS TO THE PUBLIC NOTICE AND PHYSICAL POSTING AT A DESIGNATED PUBLIC LOCATION, AS AUTHORIZED UNDER SECTION 311 (RELATING TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT ADVERTISING REQUIREMENTS).* * *"LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT." A COUNTY, CITY, BOROUGH, INCORPORATED TOWN, TOWNSHIP, SCHOOL DISTRICT, MUNICIPAL AUTHORITY OR ANY ENTITY GOVERNED BY A HOME RULE CHARTER, OPTIONAL PLAN OR OPTIONAL CHARTER UNDER THE LAWS OF THIS COMMONWEALTH.* * *"PUBLICATION."(1) THE ACT OF PRINTING A NOTICE, ADVERTISEMENT, OR PROCLAMATION, FOR THE PURPOSE OF DISSEMINATING INFORMATION TO THE PEOPLE AT LARGE.(2) A JOURNAL, MAGAZINE, NEWSPAPER, CLASS NEWSPAPER OR PERIODICAL.(3) AN ALTERNATIVE PUBLICATION METHOD.* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 306 OF TITLE 45 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SUBSECTION TO READ:§ 306. USE OF TRADE PUBLICATIONS.* * *(C) LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT.--NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER 20250SB0194PN0933 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROVISION OF THIS SECTION, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT MAY SATISFY LEGAL PUBLICATION REQUIREMENTS TO ADVERTISE FOR BIDS FOR PUBLIC WORKS, CONTRACTS, SUPPLIES OR EQUIPMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 311 (RELATING TO LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT ADVERTISING REQUIREMENTS).SECTION 3. TITLE 45 IS AMENDED BY ADDING A SECTION TO READ:§ 311. LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT ADVERTISING REQUIREMENTS.(A) ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE REQUIREMENTS.--IF AN ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE IS REQUIRED TO BE PUBLISHED BY THIS TITLE OR OTHER STATUTE, A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT SHALL FULFILL THE REQUIREMENT BY USING ONE OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS:(1) NEWSPAPER.(2) (I) PUBLICATION ON THE OFFICIAL PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE COUNTY IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT IS LOCATED.(II) PUBLICATION ON THE OFFICIAL PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT, IF PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITES EXIST.(III) PHYSICAL POSTING OF A COPY OF THE ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE AT:(A) THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT; AND(B) THE PUBLIC BUILDING IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT REGULARLY CONDUCTS PUBLIC MEETINGS.(B) EXCEPTION.--IF A LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT DOES NOT OPERATE OR MAINTAIN ITS OWN OFFICIAL PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE, THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT SHALL SATISFY THE REQUIREMENTS OF SUBSECTION (A) BY DOING EACH OF THE FOLLOWING:(1) PUBLISHING THE ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE ON THE OFFICIAL PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE INTERNET WEBSITE OF THE COUNTY 20250SB0194PN0933 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT IS LOCATED.(2) PUBLISHING THE ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION WITHIN THE COUNTY OR LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT.(3) POSTING A PHYSICAL COPY OF THE ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE AT:(I) THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT; AND(II) THE PUBLIC BUILDING IN WHICH THE LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT REGULARLY CONDUCTS PUBLIC MEETINGS.(C) RETENTION OF RECORDS.--EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT SHALL RETAIN A COPY OF EACH ADVERTISEMENT OR NOTICE, BOTH PHYSICALLY AND ELECTRONICALLY, FOR A PERIOD OF NOT LESS THAN THREE YEARS.(D) CONSTRUCTION.--NOTHING IN THIS SECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO ELIMINATE THE OBLIGATION TO PUBLISH IN A LEGAL JOURNAL IF THE PUBLICATION IS REQUIRED UNDER THIS TITLE OR ANY OTHER LAW.SECTION 4. THE DEFINITION OF "PUBLIC NOTICE" IN SECTION 703 OF TITLE 65 IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 703. DEFINITIONS.THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES WHEN USED IN THIS CHAPTER SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:* * *"PUBLIC NOTICE."(1) FOR A MEETING:(I) PUBLICATION OF NOTICE OF THE PLACE, DATE AND TIME OF A MEETING IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION[, AS DEFINED BY 45 PA.C.S. § 101 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS),] WHICH IS PUBLISHED AND CIRCULATED IN THE 20250SB0194PN0933 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 POLITICAL SUBDIVISION WHERE THE MEETING WILL BE HELD, OR IN A NEWSPAPER OF GENERAL CIRCULATION WHICH HAS A BONA FIDE PAID CIRCULATION IN THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION EQUAL TO OR GREATER THAN ANY NEWSPAPER PUBLISHED IN THE POLITICAL SUBDIVISION.(II) POSTING A NOTICE OF THE PLACE, DATE AND TIME OF A MEETING PROMINENTLY AT THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE AGENCY HOLDING THE MEETING OR AT THE PUBLIC BUILDING IN WHICH THE MEETING IS TO BE HELD.(III) GIVING NOTICE TO PARTIES UNDER SECTION 709(C) (RELATING TO PUBLIC NOTICE).(IV) PUBLICATION USING AN ALTERNATIVE PUBLICATION METHOD AS DEFINED BY 45 PA.C.S. § 101 (RELATING TO DEFINITIONS) SATISFIES THIS REQUIREMENT.(2) FOR A RECESSED OR RECONVENED MEETING:(I) POSTING A NOTICE OF THE PLACE, DATE AND TIME OF THE MEETING PROMINENTLY AT THE PRINCIPAL OFFICE OF THE AGENCY HOLDING THE MEETING OR AT THE PUBLIC BUILDING IN WHICH THE MEETING IS TO BE HELD.(II) GIVING NOTICE TO PARTIES UNDER SECTION 709(C).* * *SECTION 5. WITHIN 90 DAYS AFTER THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THIS SECTION, COUNTIES SHALL DESIGNATE AN OFFICE AS THE MAIN CONTACT FOR RECEIVING PUBLIC NOTICES FROM LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNITS. CONTACT INFORMATION, INCLUDING PHONE NUMBER AND EMAIL ADDRESS, SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE TO EACH LOCAL GOVERNMENT UNIT THAT RESIDES IN THE COUNTY.SECTION 6. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT AS FOLLOWS:(1) SECTION 5 OF THIS ACT AND THIS SECTION SHALL TAKE EFFECT IMMEDIATELY.20250SB0194PN0933 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) THE REMAINDER OF THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 90 DAYS.20250SB0194PN0933 - 8 - 12